Washington statutes.
RCW 15.48.280

Security interest not created by contract—Filing, recording or notice of contract not required to establish validity of contract or title in bailor.

Seed bailment contracts for the increase of agricultural seeds shall not create a security interest under the terms of the Uniform Commercial Code, chapter 62A.9A RCW. No filing, recording, or notice of a seed bailment contract shall be required under any of the laws of the state to establish, during the term of a seed bailment contract the validity of any such contracts, nor to establish and confirm in the bailor the title to all seed, seed stock, plant life and the resulting seed crop thereof grown or produced by the bailee under the terms of a bailment contract.

[ 2011 c 103 s 4; 1967 c 114 s 15.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Emergency—Effective date—1967 c 114: See note following RCW 62A.4-406.